src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
Võro language verbs inflect for person and number.

There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
* Yaml: **V-kasuma48**

There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
* Yaml: **V-kuioma48**

There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
* Yaml: **V-palama48**

There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
* Yaml: ____

There are other verbs here, cf. V_ELAEMAE
* Yaml: __V-sadama48__

Pss_PrfPrc: sadat

* **LEXICON V_49LWPMA** lõpma:lõpp
* **LEXICON V_49LWPMA/XX** lõpma:lõ%{pØ%}p

* **LEXICON V_50TONISWMA** tonisõma:tonis
* Yaml: **toniswma50**
* **LEXICON V_50TONISWMA/HELISEMAE** tonisõma:tonis

* **LEXICON V_50HELISEMAE** helisemä:helis
* Yaml: **helisemae50**

* **LEXICON V_51NWSWMA** nõsõma:nõs
* Yaml: **nwswma51**
cf. tulõma
* **LEXICON V_51PAESEMAE** päsemä:päs
* Yaml: **paesemae51**
cf. tulõma

* **LEXICON V_51NWSWMA/PAESEMAE** nõsõma:nõs

* **LEXICON V_52ALOSTWLWMA** alostõlõma:alostõll
* Yaml: **alostwllwma52**
* **LEXICON V_52EHITELEMAE** ehitelemä:ehitell
ehitelemä:ehitell
* Yaml: **ehitellemae52**

* **LEXICON V_52ALOSTWLWMA/EHITELEMAE** alostõllõma:alostõ%{lØ%}l

* **LEXICON V_53KAEMA** kaema:ka
* **LEXICON V_53JAEAEMAE** 
* **LEXICON V_53XX/JAEAEMAE** 

* :%^VOWRaise Harm-Neutr_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE-PSS-IND-PRT_di ;  only 3rd person

*  ACT-PRFPRC_nUq-SG-NOM ;  jäänüq keenüq

* :%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  jäi kii
* :%^VowRM%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  jäi kei
* :%^VOWRaise ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;  (5) RAISED jääs jääseq 

*  ACT-IND-PRS-PL3_vAq ;  (6) joovaq sööväq

* **LEXICON V_53KAEMA/XX** kaema:ka

* :%>e Harm-Neutr_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE-PSS-IND-PRT_di ;  only 3rd person

* :%>e ACT-PRFPRC_nUq-SG-NOM ;  jäänüq keenüq

* :%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  jäi kii
* :%>e V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  jäi kei
* :%>e ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ;  (5) RAISED jääs jääseq 

* :%>e ACT-IND-PRS-PL3_vAq ;  (6) joovaq sööväq

* __LEXICON V_54ISTMA__ 
* __LEXICON V_54LEPMAE__ 
* __LEXICON V_54ISTMA/LEPMAE__ 

* **LEXICON V_55KWNWLWMA** kõnõlõma:kõ̭nõl
* Yaml: **kwnwlwma55**
* **LEXICON V_55HAERELEMAE** härelemä:härel
* Yaml: **haerelemae55**

* **LEXICON V_56HIIBWLWMA** hiibõlõma:hiibõl
* Yaml: **hiibwlwma56**
* **LEXICON V_56HEIKELEMAE** heikelemä:heikel
* Yaml: **heikelemae56**

* **LEXICON V_56HIIBWLWMA/HEIKELEMAE** hiibõlõma:hiibõl

* **LEXICON V_56KAIBLWMA** kaiblõma+V:kai%{bv%}%{õØ%}l
* Yaml: **hiibwlwma56**

* **LEXICON V_56KAIBLWMA/XX** kaiblõma+V:kai%{bv%}%{õØ%}l

taplõma:tapõl
* Yaml: **taplwma57**
ütlemä:ütel
* Yaml: **kiirdlemae57**

* *taplõma:* `taplõma+V+Inf/mA` (Eng. # (1))
* *tapõldaq:* `taplõma+V+Inf` (Eng. # (2))
* *tapõlnuq:* `taplõma+V+Act+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (3))
* *tapõld:* `taplõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc` (Eng. # (4))
* *taplõ:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (5))
* *taplõt:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2` (Eng. # (5))
* *taplõs:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (6))
* *taplõmiq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1` (Eng. # (5))
* *taplõtiq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2` (Eng. # (5))
* *taplõsõq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3` (Eng. # (5))
* *taplõ:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII` (Eng. # (1))
* *tapli:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1` (Eng. # (7))
* *taplit:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2` (Eng. # (7))
* *tapõĺ:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3` (Eng. # (8))
* *taplimiq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1` (Eng. # (7))
* *taplitiq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2` (Eng. # (7))
* *tapliq:* `taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3` (Eng. # (7))
* *tapõlda:* `taplõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1` (Eng. # (4))
* *tapõldas:* `taplõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # (4))
* *taplõv:* `taplõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # (1))
* *tapõlguq:* `taplõma+V+Jus` (Eng. # (2,3,4, ?9))

võitlõma:võitõl
* Yaml: **taplwma57**
kiirdlemä:keerdel
* Yaml: **kiirdlemae57**

* *väär{dØ}{eØ}{lĺ}{front}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{eõ}>m{aä}*
* *väärd0l00000000>e>mä*

kullõma+V:ku%{lØ%}l%{õØ%}%{lĺ%}
* Yaml: **kiirdlemae57**

* *ku%{lØ%}l%{õØ%}%{lĺ%}{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^CC2C^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{eõ}>m{aä}*
* *ku0l0l00000000>õ>ma*

* **LEXICON V_58HIRNAHTAMA** hirnahtama:hirnahta
* Yaml: **V-hirnahtama58**

* **LEXICON V_58TAEHENDAEMAE** tähendämä:tähendä
* Yaml: **V-hirnahtama58, V-taehendaemae**
front

* **LEXICON V_58HIRNAHTAMA/TAEHENDAEMAE** hirnahtama:hirnahta, tähendämä:tähend

* **LEXICON V_59KAOTAMA** kaotama:kaota
Based on 59KAOTAMA
* Yaml: **kerguetaemae**

* **LEXICON V_59KAOTAMA/KERGUETAEMAE** kaotama:kao, kergütämä:kergü

+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1
+Pss+PrsPrc, +Pss+PrfPrc

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Act+Ind+ConNegII, +Act+Imprt+Sg2
+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg, +Act+Ind+Prt+Neg, +Act+Ind+ConNegI

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^VOWRaise%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>i   ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/SG2_q/PL3_q ;  kaodi
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1, +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2

* :%^VOWRaise%^StrGStem%^NoPAL%>i Harm-Neutr_ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;  kaoti
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1,
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2, +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

*kaotama examples:*
* *kaoda-aiq:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg`
* *kaoda-as:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg`
* *kaoda:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII`
* *kaoda:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *kaodaq:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI`
* *kaodi:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *kaodiq:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3`
* *kaotaguq:* `kaotama+V+Jus`
* *kaotama:* `kaotama+V+Inf/mA`
* *kaotamiq:* `kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1`
* *kaotanu:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen`
* *kaotanuhe:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill`
* *kaotanuid:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par`
* *kaotanuidõ:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen`
* *kaotanuihe:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill`
* *kaotanuq:* `kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc`

* **LEXICON V_60MANITSWMA** manitsõma:mani
* Yaml: **manitswma60,manitswma61>manitswma**
* **LEXICON V_60EHITSEMAE** ehitsemä:ehii
* Yaml: **manitswma60,manitswma61>manitswma**

* **LEXICON V_60MANITSWMA/EHITSEMAE** manitsõma:mani

argnõma:arg
* Yaml: **argnwma62**
tärknemä:tärk
* Yaml: **taerknemae62**

* **LEXICON V_63SWIMAMA** sõimama:sõima
* Yaml: **V-swimama63**
* **LEXICON V_63SWIMAMA/XX** sõimama:sõima

* **LEXICON V_63VISKAMA** viskama:vis%{kØ%}a
gradation: yes
* Yaml: **V-viskama63**
* **LEXICON V_63HINGAEMAE** hingämä:hingä
gradation: no
* Yaml: **V-hingaemae63**

* **LEXICON V_63VISKAMA/HINGAEMAE** viskama:viska

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>di K ;  no    q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>di K ;  no    q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>tid%{eõ%} K ;  no    q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>timi K ;  no    q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>titi K ;  no    q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>tiv%{aä%} K ;  no    q

+Pss+Ind+Prt +Sg1-+Pl3, ConNeg

THIS FAR 2016-08-27
* Yaml: **V-puhksama64**
* Yaml: **V-rehksaemae64**

* **LEXICON V_67HARINWMA** harinõma:hari
* Yaml: **harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma**
* **LEXICON V_67NAEGUENEMAE** nägünemä:nägü
* Yaml: **harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma**

* **LEXICON V_67HARINWMA/NAEGUENEMAE** harinõma:hari

* Yaml: **V-harkuma68**
* Yaml: **V-naelguemae68**

* **LEXICON V_69HAARDUMA** haarduma:haar%{dØ%}u
* **LEXICON V_69SUENDUEMAE** sündümä:sün%{dn%}ü
* **LEXICON V_69HAARDUMA/SUENDUEMAE** sündümä:sündü

Act_Ind_Prs_Pl3: essüseq

* **LEXICON V_69SUURDUMA** suurduma:suurdu
* **LEXICON V_69HUEUERDUEMAE** hüürdümä:h%{öü%}%{öü%}r%{dØ%}ü
* **LEXICON V_69SUURDUMA/HUEUERDUEMAE** hüürdümä:h%{öü%}%{öü%}r%{dØ%}ü vowel raising Required 2016-09-15

V_Inf/mA: miildümä 

* **LEXICON V_70UNWHUMA** unõhuma:unõhtu
* Yaml: **V-unwhuma**
* **LEXICON V_70ÄNGÄHÜMÄ** ängähümä:ängähtü
* Yaml: **V-eraelduemae**

* **LEXICON V_70UNWHUMA/ÄNGÄHÜMÄ** unõhuma:unõhtu

* **LEXICON V_70VIPWRDUMA** unõhtuma:unõhtu
* Yaml: **V-unwhtuma**
* **LEXICON V_70ERAELDUEMAE** eräldümä:eräldü
* Yaml: **V-eraelduemae**

* **LEXICON V_70VIPWRDUMA/ERAELDUEMAE** unõhtuma:unõhtu

* **LEXICON V_71HALLWTUMA** hallõtuma:hallõtu
* Yaml: **V-hallwtuma**
* **LEXICON V_71ERAETUEMAE** erätümä:erä%{td%}ü
* Yaml: **V-eraetuemae**

* **LEXICON V_71HALLWTUMA/ERAETUEMAE** hallõtuma:hallõtu

* **LEXICON V_72VAOMA** vaoma:%{ˋØ%}va%^I7o
* Yaml: **vaoma**
* **LEXICON V_72TAEUEMAE** täümä:täü
* Yaml: **haeoemae**

* **LEXICON V_72VAOMA/TAEUEMAE** vaoma:vao

* **LEXICON V_74KULUMA** kuluma:kullu
* Yaml: **V-kuluma**
* **LEXICON V_74VAESUEMAE** väsümä:vässü
* Yaml: **V-vaesuemae**

* **LEXICON V_74KULUMA/VAESUEMAE** kuluma:kullu

* **LEXICON V_75VALAMA** valama:vala
* Yaml: **V-valama75**
vala, valla, vali, valõ
* **LEXICON V_75JAERAEMAE** järämä:järä
* Yaml: **V-jaeraemae75**

* **LEXICON V_75VALAMA/JAERAEMAE** valama:vala

* **LEXICON V_76HIGOMA** higoma:hi%{kg0%}o
* Yaml: **V-higoma76**
* **LEXICON V_76PUEGAEMAE** pügämä:pü%{kg0%}ä
* Yaml: **V-puegaemae76**

* **LEXICON V_76HIGOMA/PUEGAEMAE** higoma:hi%{kg0%}o
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 

* :%^Pen%^G3 Harm-Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;  (2) lukõq
* :%^Pen%^G3 Harm-Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;  (2b) lukõv
Inf, Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc

* :%^Pen%^G2 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;  (6) lugõma
Ind+Prs+ 3

Retain consonant and stem vowel

Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel

Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
Pss+Ind

Retain consonant and stem vowel

Weaken consonant and replace stem vowel with i
* :%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ;  (7) loi
Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

Retain consonant remove stem vowel and add i
* :%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ;  (8) lugi
Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

+Jus

* **LEXICON V_76JAGAMA** jagama:ja%{kg0%}a
* Yaml: **V-higoma76**

* **LEXICON V_76JAGAMA/XX** jagama:ja%{kg0%}a
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 

* :%^Pen%^G3 Harm-Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;  (2) lukõq
* :%^Pen%^G3 Harm-Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;  (2b) lukõv
Inf, Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc

* :%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRMe Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC ;  (4) loet

*  ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;  (6) lugõma
Ind+Prs+ 3

Retain consonant and stem vowel

Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel

Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
Pss+Ind

Retain consonant and stem vowel

Weaken consonant and replace stem vowel with i
* :%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ;  (7) loi
Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

Retain consonant remove stem vowel and add i
* :%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ;  (8) lugi
Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

+Jus

* **LEXICON V_76LUGWMA** lugõma:lu%{kg0%}õ
* Yaml: **V-higoma76**

* **LEXICON V_76LUGWMA/XX** lugõma:lu%{kg0%}õ

Retain consonant and stem vowel
* :%^Pen%^G2 Harm-Neutr_INF_mA ;  (1) lugõma:lu%{kgØ%}õ

Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel
* :%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>e Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC ;  (4) loet
Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc

Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel

Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
Pss+Ind

Retain consonant and stem vowel
*  ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;  (6) lugõma
Ind+Prs+ 3

Weaken consonant and replace stem vowel with i
* :%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ;  (7) loi
Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

Retain consonant remove stem vowel and add i
* :%^VowRM%>i Harm-Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ;  (8) lugi
Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

* **LEXICON V_77JUUMA** juuma:joo
* Yaml: **juuma**
* **LEXICON V_77SUEUEMAE** süümä:süü
* Yaml: **sueuemae**

* **LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE** juuma:joo

* :%^OO2Õ%>i V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  (4) jõi- poi- sei- möi-

* :%^VOWRaise V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL ;  (1) juu, süü

* :%^VOWLower V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NOT-RAISED-VOWEL ;  (2) joo- söö-

* :%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>vv V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ;  (3) juvv
